Maryland, session 2025, SB0790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall convene a workgroup to implement
Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment requirements.
(b) The workgroup shall include the following members:
(1) behavioral health professionals who work with children and families;
(2) childhood mental health specialists;
(3) clinicians who work with children and families;
(4) children with behavioral health issues;
(5) behavioral health advocates;
(6) parents and caregivers with experience navigating the behavioral
health system on behalf of children; and
(7) other interested stakeholders.
(c) (a) The Behavioral Health Advisory Council and the Commission on Behavioral
Health Care Treatment and Access, through its workgroup on youth behavioral health,
individuals with developmental disabilities, and individuals with complex behavioral
health needs, shall create a plan provide recommendations to implement the
recommendations in Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services State Health Official
– 1 –

Ch. 686 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
letter #24–005: Best Practices for Adhering to Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic,
and Treatment (EPSDT) Requirements for children, including:
(1) screening and assessment of behavioral health conditions;
(2) the feasibility of implementing the DC:0–5 Diagnostic Classification of
Mental Health and Developmental Disorders of Infancy and Early Childhood as a
diagnostic tool for patients under the age of 5 years;
(3) community–based services to correct and ameliorate a wide range of
behavioral health conditions; and
(4) services to:
(i) ensure children’s behavioral health;
(ii) address early symptoms of concern, with or without a diagnosis;
and
(iii) address urgent and crisis needs.
(b) In performing the duties described in subsection (a) of this section, the Council
and Commission, through its workgroup, shall consult with:
(1) behavioral health professionals who work with children and families;
(2) early childhood mental health specialists;
(3) clinicians who work with children and families;
(4) children with behavioral health issues;
(5) behavioral health advocates;
(6) parents and caregivers with experience navigating the behavioral
health system on behalf of children; and
(7) other interested stakeholders.
(d) (c) On or before December 1, 2025 January 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of
Health shall submit a report of the its findings and recommendations of the workgroup to
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 686
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –